Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.460

Operating agency to pay in lieu of taxes.

Any joint operating agency formed under this chapter shall pay in lieu of taxes payments in the same amounts as paid by public utility districts. Such payments shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions applicable to public utility districts.

[ 2005 c 443 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 75 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.52.460. Prior: 1957 c 295 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2005 c 443: See notes following RCW 82.08.0255.